Idaho, session 2026, H0857.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 32-717A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 7, Title 32, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 32-717A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
32-717A. PARENTS' ACCESS TO RECORDS AND INFORMATION. (1) Consistent
with section 32-1015, Idaho Code, and notwithstanding any other provisions
of law, each parent shall have equal access to all records relating to the
parent's minor child, including medical, educational, childcare, law en-
forcement, and court records, regardless of custodial status. Upon written
request, a records custodian shall provide copies within fourteen (14) cal-
endar days unless a shorter period is required by law.
(2) Access may be restricted only by court order with written findings
that the restriction is necessary to prevent substantial harm to the child.
Nothing in this section shall require disclosure in violation of federal
law.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.